Nevada, session 83, SB53.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 408 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the Department maintains an Internet website or mobile
application to communicate to the public information concerning
the conditions for driving on some or all of the highways in this
State, including, without limitation, Nevada 511 or any successor
Internet website or application, the Department shall create and
maintain an electronic system which allows a qualified
representative of a city, county or regional transportation
commission to submit to the Department, for upload to the
Internet website or mobile application as soon as practicable,
information related to a current or anticipated road closure, road
hazard, lane closure, construction project, accident or other road
condition which impacts a highway:
(a) Under the jurisdiction of the city, county or regional
transportation commission; and
(b) For which the condition is communicated by the Internet
website or mobile application.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “City” means an incorporated city.
(b) “Qualified representative” means a person who is
authorized by his or her respective city, county or regional
transportation commission to submit information through
the electronic system created and maintained pursuant to
subsection 1.
(c) “Regional transportation commission” means a regional
transportation commission created pursuant to NRS 277A.170.
Sec. 2. NRS 408.557 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.557 1. The Director shall adopt regulations:
(a) Governing the size, shape, lighting and other characteristics
of a sign to be erected at a location designated pursuant to
NRS 408.553;
(b) Authorizing the use of trademarks and symbols identifying
an individual enterprise on a sign erected at the location;
(c) Fixing the qualifications of a person or governmental agency
to erect or construct, operate, sponsor or maintain a center or sign
and of an enterprise to be identified on a directional or informational
sign;
(d) Fixing reasonable fees, based upon the market value as
determined by the Department, for:
-
*SB53*

– 4 –
(1) Authorizing the use of trademarks and symbols
identifying an individual enterprise on a directional or informational
sign; and
(2) Providing:
(I) Information concerning commercial attractions; and
(II) Items designed to promote tourism in this State; and
(e) Otherwise necessary to carry out the provisions of NRS
408.551 to 408.567, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
2. The regulations adopted by the Director pursuant to
subsection 1 must be consistent with the provisions of 23 U.S.C. §§
111 and 131.
Sec. 3. NRS 408.559 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.559 The Department shall develop a plan, in cooperation
with the Commission on Tourism, to carry out the provisions of
NRS 408.551 to 408.567, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
The plan must take into consideration such factors as:
1. Economic development in this state.
2. Availability of money for the purposes of NRS 408.551 to
408.567, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
3. Population in a particular area.
4. Proposed highway construction.
5. Need for information.
 The Department and the Commission shall review the plan at
least once each year and revise it until the provisions of NRS
408.551 to 408.567, inclusive, and section 1 of this act have been
uniformly put into effect throughout the State.
Sec. 4. NRS 408.567 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.567 1. Money received by the Department from:
(a) Fees for:
(1) Authorizing the use of trademarks and symbols
identifying an individual enterprise on a directional or informational
sign; and
(2) Providing:
(I) Information concerning commercial attractions; and
(II) Items designed to promote tourism in this State;
(b) Participants in a telephone system established to reserve
accommodations for travelers; and
(c) Appropriations made by the Legislature for the purposes of
NRS 408.551 to 408.567, inclusive, and section 1 of this act,
 must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the
Account for Systems of Providing Information to the Traveling
Public in the State Highway Fund, which is hereby created.
2. Money in the Account must only be used to carry out the
provisions of NRS 408.551 to 408.567, inclusive [.] , and section 1
of this act.
-
*SB53*

– 5 –
Sec. 5. NRS 408.581 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.581 1. The Advisory Committee on Traffic Safety is
hereby created in the Department. The Advisory Committee consists
of the following voting members:
(a) The Director of the Department of Transportation or his or
her designee;
(b) The Director of the Department of Health and Human
Services or his or her designee;
(c) The Director of the Department of Motor Vehicles or his or
her designee;
(d) The Director of the Department of Public Safety or his or her
designee;
(e) The Superintendent of Public Instruction or his or her
designee;
(f) One member who is a representative of the Department of
Transportation, appointed by the Director of the Department of
Transportation;
(g) One member who is a representative of the Department of
Public Safety, appointed by the Director of the Department of Public
Safety;
(h) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly who
is a member of the Assembly Standing Committee on Growth and
Infrastructure during the current or immediately preceding regular
session;
(i) One member appointed by the Majority Leader of the Senate
who is a member of the Senate Standing Committee on Growth and
Infrastructure during the current or immediately preceding regular
session;
(j) One member who is a representative of the Administrative
Office of the Courts, appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Court of Nevada;
(k) One member who represents tribal governments in Nevada,
appointed by the Inter-Tribal Council of Nevada, Inc., or its
successor organization;
(l) Two members who are full- or part-time faculty members in
the Nevada System of Higher Education and have expertise in
traffic safety or trauma care, appointed by the Director of the
Department of Transportation;
(m) One member appointed by each metropolitan planning
organization to represent the appointing organization;
(n) One member appointed by the Nevada Association of
Counties;
(o) One member appointed by the Nevada League of Cities; and
(p) One member who represents local law enforcement agencies,
appointed by the Nevada Sheriffs’ and Chiefs’ Association.
-
*SB53*

– 6 –
2. The Director of the Department of Transportation shall
appoint as nonvoting members of the Advisory Committee two
members who represent navigation providers.
3. The Director of the Department of Transportation may
appoint as nonvoting members of the Advisory Committee such
other persons as the Director deems appropriate.
[3.] 4. The term of office of each member appointed to the
Advisory Committee is 2 years. Such members may be reappointed
for additional terms of 2 years in the same manner as the original
appointments. Any vacancy occurring in the appointed voting
membership of the Advisory Committee must be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment not later than 30 days after the
vacancy occurs.
[4.] 5. The members of the Advisory Committee shall elect
from their voting membership a Chair and a Vice Chair. The term of
office of the Chair and the Vice Chair is 2 years. If a vacancy occurs
in the office of Chair or Vice Chair, the members of the Advisory
Committee shall elect a Chair or Vice Chair, as applicable, from
among its voting members to serve for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
[5.] 6. The Advisory Committee shall meet at least once each
calendar quarter and may meet at such further times as deemed
necessary by the Chair.
[6.] 7. A majority of the voting members of the Advisory
Committee constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. If a
quorum is present, the affirmative vote of a majority of the voting
members of the Advisory Committee present is sufficient for any
official action taken by the Advisory Committee.
[7.] 8. Each member of the Advisory Committee serves
without compensation and is not entitled to receive a per diem
allowance or travel expenses.
[8.] 9. The Department shall provide administrative support to
the Advisory Committee.
[9.] 10. The Advisory Committee shall review, study and make
recommendations regarding:
(a) Evidence-based best practices for reducing or preventing
deaths and injuries related to motor vehicle crashes on roadways in
this State;
(b) Data on motor vehicle crashes resulting in death or serious
bodily injury in this State, including, without limitation, factors that
cause such crashes and measures known to prevent such crashes;
(c) Policies intended to reduce or prevent deaths and injuries
related to motor vehicle crashes on roadways in this State; and
(d) Any other matter submitted by the Chair.
-
*SB53*

– 7 –
[10.] 11. The Advisory Committee shall prepare and submit to
the Governor and to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
for transmittal to the Legislature an annual report concerning the
activities of the Advisory Committee that addresses, without
limitation, any issue reviewed or studied and any recommendations
made by the Advisory Committee pursuant to subsection [9.] 10.
[11.] 12. The Advisory Committee may establish such working
groups, task forces and similar entities from within or outside its
membership as necessary to address specific issues or otherwise to
assist in its work.
[12.] 13. As used in this section [,“metropolitan] :
(a) “Metropolitan planning organization” means an entity that
has been designated as a metropolitan planning organization
pursuant to 23 U.S.C. § 134 and 49 U.S.C. § 5303.
(b) “Navigation provider” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 6 of this act.
Sec. 6. Chapter 597 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A city, county, regional transportation commission, the
Department of Transportation or any other public authority may,
at any time, transmit a written or electronic notification to a
navigation provider regarding a current or anticipated road
closure, road hazard, lane closure, construction project, accident
or other road condition which impacts a highway in this State
under the jurisdiction of the city, county, regional transportation
commission, Department of Transportation or other public
authority. If the navigation provider has appointed a registered
agent located in this State, the notification must be transmitted to
the registered agent, unless the navigation provider posts on its
Internet website or within the navigation application an
alternative method of providing the notification.
2. A city, county, regional transportation commission, the
Department of Transportation or any other public authority may
include in a notification transmitted pursuant to subsection 1
information concerning the route recommended by the city,
county, regional transportation commission, Department of
Transportation or other public authority for directing traffic
around the road condition. A navigation provider is not required
to incorporate a recommended route which is included in a
notification pursuant to this subsection into the real-time traffic
and road closure data used to provide turn-by-turn directions in
real time to an end user of the navigation application.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 4, a
navigation provider who receives a notification transmitted
pursuant to subsection 1 shall incorporate the information
-
*SB53*

– 8 –
contained in the notification regarding the existence of a road
condition into the navigation application not later than:
(a) Forty-eight hours after the notification is received by the
navigation provider; or
(b) The time at which the road condition contained in the
notification occurs, if the road condition does not occur until more
than 48 hours after the notification was received.
4. A navigation provider is not required to incorporate the
information contained in the notification regarding the existence
of a road condition into the navigation application pursuant to
subsection 3 if the road condition resolves before the time by
which the navigation provider would be required to incorporate
the information pursuant to subsection 3.
5. A navigation provider who violates subsection 3 remains in
violation of that subsection until:
(a) The navigation provider incorporates the information
contained in the notification regarding the existence of a road
condition into the navigation application; or
(b) The road condition contained in the notification ceases to
exist or is otherwise resolved.
6. A navigation provider who violates the provisions of
subsection 3 is subject to a civil penalty of $500 per day of the
violation, and each day’s continuance of the violation constitutes a
separate and distinct violation.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “City” means an incorporated city.
(b) “Highway” means any street, road, alley, thoroughfare or
way of any kind, paved or unpaved, which is used or open to the
use of the public for the purpose of vehicular travel.
(c) “Navigation application”:
(1) Means an Internet website, online service or mobile
application which:
(I) Offers turn-by-turn directions in real time to an end
user; and
(II) Incorporates real-time data concerning traffic and
road closures into the direction and navigation services provided
to the end user.
(2) Does not include a service which:
(I) Has less than 10,000,000 active users per month;
(II) Does not offer direction and navigation services for
end users with respect to the highways in this State; or
(III) Does not incorporate real-time data concerning
traffic and road closures into the direction and navigation services
provided to the end user with respect to the highways in this State.
-
*SB53*

– 9 –
(d) “Navigation provider” means a person who operates a
navigation application.
(e) “Public authority” means a state or local governmental
agency that maintains a highway or to which a highway is
dedicated.
(f) “Regional transportation commission” means a regional
transportation commission created pursuant to NRS 277A.170.
Sec. 7. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 6, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB53*